Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3210
Authority; members; employees; prohibited acts; violations; penalty.

(1) Neither the members nor any salaried employee of the authority shall receive any compensation, emolument, or other profit directly or indirectly from the rental, management, purchase, sale, or other disposition of any lands held by such authority other than the salaries, expenses, and emoluments provided for in the Land Reutilization Act.

(2) Any person convicted of violating any provision of this section shall be guilty of a felony and shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by imprisonment in a Department of Correctional Services adult correctional facility not less than two years nor more than five years.

Laws 1973, LB 73, § 10;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 23;

Laws 2008, LB710, § 4.